src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON _TAOLINE_SUGUNE

 _TAOLINE;
 _SUGUNE;

LEXICON _TAOLINE

taoline+Pron:taoli 12_NE-SE-S;
taoline+Pron:taoli 10_NE-SE-S;

LEXICON _SUGUNE

sugune+Pron:sugu 10_NE-SE-S;

LEXICON Pronouns
iga _SUGUNE;
ise _SUGUNE;
mingi _SUGUNE;
miski _SUGUNE;
mis _SUGUNE;
mõne _SUGUNE;
naa _SUGUNE;
nii _SUGUNE;
see _SUGUNE;
teis  _SUGUNE; ! ??? ÕS ütleb, et ARGI teistsugune, kas peaks olema deskriptiivses ainult?
teist _SUGUNE;
mille _TAOLINE;
sama _TAOLINE;
selle _TAOLINE;
meie _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
minu _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
mitme _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
nende _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
oma _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
sinu _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
teie _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
tema _TAOLINE_SUGUNE;
